Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 27 Access to Decedents’ Electronic Mail Accounts Act [Repealed.]

33-27-1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 256, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 15, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 15, 2019.

33-27-2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 12; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 15, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 15, 2019.

33-27-3.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 12; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 15, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 15, 2019.

33-27-4.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 256, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 15, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 15, 2019.

33-27-5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 256, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 15, 2019; P.L. 2019, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 15, 2019.